Utah statutes.
26-4-17.   Records of medical examiner -- Copies furnished to next-of-kin, law enforcement officers, and attending physician -- Confidentiality.

(1)  The medical examiner shall keep and maintain full and complete original records, properly indexed, giving the name, if known, or otherwise identifying every person whose death is investigated, the place where the body was found, the date, the cause and manner of death, the occupation of the decedent if available, and all other relevant information concerning the death. A full report and detailed findings of the autopsy or report of the investigation shall be part of the record in each case.

(2)  The county attorney, the district attorney, the attorney general, or other law enforcement official having jurisdiction may, upon written request, secure copies of the original records where necessary for the performance of their duties.

(3)  The medical examiner shall promptly deliver copies of all reports, findings, and records gathered or compiled in the investigation of a death to the decedent's next-of-kin, legal representative, or physicians who attended the decedent during the year before death, upon their written request for the release of documents.

(4)  The medical examiner shall maintain the confidentiality of the records which shall be released as provided herein and upon payment of fees prescribed by the department under Section 26-1-6.

